Vermont, session 2025-2026, S281.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. VERMONT ZERO-CARBON NUCLEAR FEASIBILITY STUDY
(a) Creation. There is created the Nuclear Power Study Committee to
identify the obstacles to constructing a new nuclear energy generation facility
in Vermont, including those in State and federal law.
(b) Membership. The Study Committee shall have seven members
appointed as follows:
(1) the Chair of the Public Utility Commission or designee;
(2) a representative from the Vermont Electric Power Company;
(3) a representative from ISO New England Inc.;
VT LEG #379041 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.281
2026 Page 2 of 4
(4) two current members of the House of Representatives, each from
different political parties, who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House;
and
(5) two current members of the Senate, each from different political
parties, who shall be appointed by the Committee on Committees.
(c) Powers and duties. The Study Committee shall:
(1) review reasons why the prior nuclear generation facility closed, what
obstacles exist in both State and federal law, and what practical issues may
exist that would prevent a new facility from opening; and
(2) hear from a variety of stakeholders on this issue, including
representatives of electric utilities, representatives from NextEra Energy,
representatives from the Nuclear Energy Institute, and representatives from the
U.S. Department of Energy.
(d) Assistance. The Study Committee shall have the administrative
assistance of the Office of Legislative Operations, the legal assistance of the
Office of Legislative Counsel, and the analytical assistance of the Joint Fiscal
Office.
(e) Meetings.
(1) The Office of Legislative Counsel shall call the first meeting of the
Study Committee to occur on or before July 31, 2026.
VT LEG #379041 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.281
2026 Page 3 of 4
(2) The Study Committee shall elect a chair from among its members at
the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Study Committee shall cease to exist on January 31, 2027.
(f) Report. On or before December 15, 2026, the Study Committee shall
submit a written report to the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and
Energy and the House Committee on Energy and Digital Infrastructure with a
summary of the feasibility study and recommendations for next steps,
including any legislative action needed.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Study Committee serving in the
legislator’s capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation
and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than six
meetings in fiscal year 2027.
(2) Other members of the Study Committee who are not otherwise
compensated by their employer shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more
than six meetings in fiscal year 2027.
(3) The payments under this subsection shall be made from monies
appropriated by the General Assembly or any grant funding received.
VT LEG #379041 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.281
2026 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379041 v.4